California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a notice shall not be sent to a provider who has made no referrals for benefits
 nor rendered benefits that are relevant to the suspected fraudulent or abusive activity identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a notice shall not be sent to a provider who receives a remittance advice from the state.

(D) Subject to subdivision (e), notices under this paragraph shall be sent to the provider’s mailing address, facsimile number, or electronic mail address, of record with the appropriate licensing agency.

(c) The notices required by this section shall be sent for as long as the department, in conjunction with the Department of Justice, deems it necessary for fraud control purposes.

(d) The notices required by this section shall be adopted jointly by the department and the Department of
 Justice.

(e) The notices required by this section shall be transmitted electronically, via facsimile, or by mail, whichever is most cost-effective, practicable, and consistent with state and federal privacy laws and regulations.

(f) Notices sent to beneficiaries pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the Medi-Cal threshold language requirements that apply to Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.2.

(a) Any person who solicits or receives any remuneration, including, but not restricted to, any kickback, bribe, or rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in valuable consideration of any kind, either:

(1) In return for the referral, or promised referral, of any individual to a person
 for the furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of any service or merchandise for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200); or

(2) In return for the purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for or recommending the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of any goods, facility, service or merchandise for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not longer than one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(b) Any person who offers or pays any remuneration, including, but not restricted to, any kickback, bribe, or rebate, directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, in cash or in valuable consideration of any kind, either:

(1) To refer any individual to a person for the furnishing or arranging for furnishing of any service or merchandise for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200); or

(2) To purchase, lease, order, or arrange for or recommend the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of any goods, facility, service, or merchandise for which payment may be made, in whole or in part, under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in a county jail for not longer than one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal
 Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to the following:

(1) Any amount paid by an employer to an employee, who has a bona fide employment relationship with that employer, for employment with provision of covered items or services.

(2) A discount or other reduction in price obtained by a provider of services or other entity under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), if the reduction in price is properly disclosed and reflected in the costs claimed or charges made by the provider or entity under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200). This
 paragraph shall not apply to consultant pharmaceutical services rendered to nursing facilities nor to all categories of intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled.

(3) The practices or transactions between a federally qualified health center, as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and any individual or entity shall be permitted only to the extent sanctioned or permitted by federal law.

(4) The provision of nonmonetary remuneration in the form of hardware, software, or information technology and training services, as described in subsections (x) and (y) of Section 1001.952 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended October 4, 2007, as published in the Federal Register (72 Fed. Reg. 56631, 56644), and subsequently amended versions.

(d) For purposes
 of this section, “kickback” means a rebate or anything of value or advantage, present or prospective, or any promise or undertaking to give any rebate or thing of value or advantage, with a corrupt intent to unlawfully influence the person to whom it is given in actions undertaken by that person in his or her public, professional, or official capacity.

(e) The enforcement remedies provided under this section are not exclusive and shall not preclude the use of any other criminal or civil remedy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 630.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.3.

Any person who knowingly and willfully charges, solicits, accepts, or receives, in addition to any amount payable under this chapter, any gift, money, contribution, donation, or other consideration as a precondition to providing services or merchandise to a Medi-Cal beneficiary for any service or merchandise in the Medi-Cal program’s scope of benefits in addition to a claim submitted to the
 Medi-Cal program under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except either:

(1) To collect payments due under a contractual or legal entitlement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14000; or

(2) To bill a long-term care patient or representative for the amount of the patient’s share of the cost; or

(3) As provided under Section 14019.3, is punishable upon a first conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not longer than one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both such imprisonment and fine. A second or subsequent conviction shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 631.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.4.

(a) Any person who, with the intent to defraud, certifies as true and correct any cost report, submitted by a hospital to a state agency for reimbursement pursuant to Section 14170, who knowingly fails to disclose in writing on the cost report any significant beneficial interest, as defined in subdivision (d), which the owners of the provider, or members of the provider
 governing board, or employees of the provider, or independent contractor of the provider, have in the contractors or vendors to the providers, is guilty of a public offense.

(b) Any person who, with the intent to defraud, knowingly causes any material false information to be included in any cost report submitted by a hospital to a state agency for reimbursement pursuant to Section 14170 shall be guilty of an offense punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by a fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both a fine and imprisonment.

(c) The provider’s chief executive officer shall certify that any cost report submitted by a hospital to a state agency for
 reimbursement pursuant to Section 14170 shall be true and correct. In the case of a hospital which is operated as a unit of a coordinated group of health facilities and under common management, either the hospital’s chief executive officer or administrator, or the chief financial officer of the operating region of which the hospital is a part, shall certify to the accuracy of the report.

(d) As used in this section, “significant beneficial interest” means any financial interest that is equal to or greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of ownership interest or 5 percent of the whole ownership or any other contractual or compensatory arrangement with vendors or contractors or immediate family members of vendors or contractors. “Immediate family” means spouse, son, daughter, father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, daughter-in-law, or son-in-law. Interests held by these persons specified in subdivision (a) and members of these
 person’s immediate family should be combined and included as a single interest.

(e) Any person who violates the provisions of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 632.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.5.

(a) The department may, pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b), rescind the privileges of a provider of durable medical equipment or incontinence supplies who fails to satisfy the requirements of this section to bill and receive payment for services provided under this chapter. 

(b) The department shall adopt regulations to define the specific causes for which the authority of a Medi-Cal provider of durable medical equipment or incontinence supplies to bill and receive payment for services provided under this chapter may be rescinded for violation
 of this section. 

(c) The department shall not rescind the authority of a Medi-Cal provider of durable medical equipment or incontinence supplies to bill and receive payment under this chapter without a prior hearing, unless any of the following conditions exist: 

(1) The provider has failed to provide material information to the department pursuant to Section 14125.8. 

(2) The provider has knowingly furnished false information on any application for provider enrollment. 

(3) The provider has knowingly filed false claims for reimbursement under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 560, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14108.

Any developmentally disabled recipient under this chapter receiving care in a nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled is entitled as a part of the therapeutic and rehabilitative program, to be temporarily absent from the facilities. The State Department of Health Services shall, with consultation from the State Department of Developmental Services, adopt regulations establishing the periods of time and conditions under which temporary absences shall be permitted. The regulations shall require that absences be in accordance with an individual program plan and provide for
 absences due to hospitalization for an acute condition. The limits on temporary leaves of absence established by the Department of Health Services by regulation shall not be less than 30 days per year.

During these temporary absences the State Department of Health Services shall reimburse the facility for the cost of maintaining the vacant accommodations at a rate determined by the department which shall be less than the regular rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 18.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14108.1.

Any recipient receiving care in a nursing facility under this chapter, as part of a certified special treatment program for persons with mental illnesses, or as a part of a mental health therapeutic and rehabilitative program approved and certified by a local mental health director, is entitled to be temporarily absent from those facilities. The department may develop regulations establishing the
 periods of time and conditions under which temporary absences shall be permitted. These regulations shall require that absences be in accordance with an individual patient care plan and also provide for absences due to hospitalization for an acute condition. The limits on temporary leaves of absence established by the department by regulation shall not be less than 30 days per year.

During these temporary absences, the department shall reimburse the facility for the cost of maintaining the vacant accommodations at a rate to be determined by the department which shall be less than the normal reimbursement rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 226.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14108.2.

Except as provided by Section 14108 and Section 14108.1, any recipient of services under this chapter who is residing in a long-term care facility shall be permitted to be temporarily absent from such facilities for up to 18 days per year, not including days of bed hold for acute hospitalization. The department may approve additional days of leave on an individual basis, not to exceed 12 days per year, exclusive of days of bed hold for acute hospitalization.

All such leaves of absence shall be in accordance with an individual patient care plan as approved by the attending physician. The director shall adopt
 regulations establishing the conditions under which additional leave days shall be authorized. The director may establish reasonable limits on the duration of any period of absence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 857, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.

In determining the medical needs of any person eligible under this chapter, and the amount of health care such person is entitled to receive, the department shall include the cost of any deductibles or, cost sharing or similar charge imposed in connection with benefits to which such person may be entitled under the federal program of health insurance for the aged and disabled, except that for those individuals 65 years of age or over, who prior to July 1, 1973, were ineligible under the federal program of health insurance for the aged, the director may include such costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 14109, effective January 1, 1982, the reimbursement rate for costs specified in Section 14109 for all services, including, but not limited to, hospital inpatient services, shall, to the extent feasible, not exceed the reimbursement rate for similar services established under this chapter. For purposes of this section, effective October 1, 1992, the reimbursement rates established under this chapter for hospital inpatient services shall be no greater than the amounts paid by the Medicare program for similar
 services.

The fiscal intermediary shall expedite the implementation of any change order resulting only from this section. The department shall provide sufficient funding for any such change order to enable the fiscal intermediary to implement such change order expeditiously and to not have to divert staff or other resources from existing contract tasks, including but not limited to those resources dedicated to the implementation of all other change orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 108.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.6.

Notwithstanding Section 14109, effective September 1, 1997, and pursuant to Section 1396a(n) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended by Section 4714 of the federal Balanced Budget Act of 1997, the reimbursement rate for costs specified in Section 14109 for all services, including, but not limited to, hospital inpatient services, shall, to the extent feasible, not exceed the reimbursement rate for similar services established under this chapter. Effective for dates of service on or after September 1, 1997, the reimbursement rates established under this
 chapter for hospital inpatient services shall be no greater than the amounts paid by the Medicare program for similar services. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, Section 14109.5 shall remain in effect for dates of service prior to September 1, 1997. It is the intent of the Legislature that regulations and the amendments to the medicaid state plan previously adopted pursuant to Section 14109.5 shall remain in effect for purposes of this section until amended or otherwise modified by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 70.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.

No payment for care or services shall be made under Medi-Cal to a medical or health care facility unless it has been certified by the department for participation, and it meets one of the following:

(a) It is licensed by the department.

(b) It is licensed by a comparable agency in another state.

(c) It is exempt from licensure.

(d) It is operated by the Regents of the University of California.

(e) It meets the utilization review plan criteria for certification or is certified as an institutional provider of services under Title XVIII of the Federal Social Security Act and regulations issued thereunder.

Nothing in this section shall preclude payments for care for aged patients in medical facilities or institutions operated or licensed by the department, or the State Department of State Hospitals, State Department of Developmental Services, State Department of Social Services, or Department of Rehabilitation.

The department shall certify facilities licensed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety
 Code for participation in the program within 30 calendar days of receipt of a complete application or date of licensure, whichever is greater, if the facility meets all the requirements for certification. The department for claims purposes only, shall enroll facilities which meet all certification requirements within 30 calendar days of the date of certification or 60 calendar days of licensure, whichever is greater.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 79.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.05.

(a) The department shall ensure that nursing facility applicants have access to assistance in identifying and securing the information necessary to complete the Medi-Cal application and to make the eligibility determination.

(b) The department shall ensure that Medi-Cal applications for nursing facility residents are processed in a timely manner in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 84, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.1.

Medi-Cal reimbursements for long-term care in any hospital shall be at a rate not to exceed the maximum rate paid for long-term care in nursing facilities which are distinct parts of acute care hospitals, except for patients whose medical or nursing needs exceed the level of care provided in nursing facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 731, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.15.

(a) The department shall develop, collect, and maintain, in an electronic format, all data elements in the minimum data set specified by the federal government. The data base shall incorporate the data required for preadmission screening and annual resident reviews, and Medi-Cal treatment authorization requests. The department shall make the format of this new data base
 available to the public.

(b) All skilled nursing facilities and nursing facilities required by federal law to complete the minimum data set form shall provide the data to the department in a manner and form prescribed by the director. The director may require that the submission of that data shall be in an electronic format.

(c) The department shall design the minimum data set data base in a manner that maintains resident confidentiality and that allows the use of the data by other authorized state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development. To the extent possible, those other state agencies shall obtain the minimum data set and preadmission screening and annual resident review data from the department’s database established and maintained pursuant to this section.

(d) To the fullest extent possible, the department shall use the minimum data set database to meet the requirements of the current treatment authorization request review process and shall automate use of the minimum data set information for that purpose.

(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the department or any other state agency from requiring additional information that is not available from the minimum data set database in order to meet other data needs.

(f) The department shall implement this section no later than the date specified by the federal government for facility completion of automation of the minimum data set data. The department shall, within a reasonable time, make necessary system changes to begin the use of the automated minimum data set data to meet its treatment authorization and preadmission screening and annual resident review
 data requirements. To the fullest extent possible, these system changes shall be anticipated and commenced in advance of the federal government’s final implementation date.

(g) The system shall be developed and implemented in consultation with representatives of the long-term care industry and other interested parties, such as physicians and other health care professionals.

(h) The department shall implement the development of the minimum data set database only if federal funds are available for that purpose. Development of the data system applications for use of the automated minimum data set database by the department are subject to federal approval and federal financial participation for the affected systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 227.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 254 of Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.2.

The director shall, unless precluded by federal law or regulation, amend the state plan under Title XIX of the Social Security Act to conform to the policy directions and budgetary decisions of the Legislature, as reflected in the Budget Act for each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 29.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.3.

Until the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare establishes, by regulation, standards in accordance with Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act for intermediate care facilities, there shall be no requirement for the provision of intermediate care in nursing homes; however, a nursing home may elect to waive the provisions of this section and voluntarily apply to the department to provide intermediate care in its facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.4.

(a) All laundry services for all apparel, linen, garments, towels, and hospital gowns shall be provided by a nursing facility or any category of intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled at no cost to a recipient under this chapter. These laundry services shall be considered as part of the basic care provided by the facility under the daily rate provided for pursuant to this chapter. The director shall, if necessary, adjust the daily rate to provide for the costs of these services. A facility may, however, charge the patient a fee to provide special drycleaning or treatment for a
 garment needing this care, when the garment is owned by the patient and when the regular laundry service is not appropriate.

(b) A facility shall provide a periodic hair trim as part of its care for all patients who are recipients under this chapter. This service shall be included as part of the daily rate provided for pursuant to this chapter. The director shall, if necessary, adjust the daily rate to provide for the costs of these services. A facility may, however, charge a fee for beauty shop services for patients who request special treatments or styling of their hair.

(c) The director shall seek all federal funds available for implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 19.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.5.

Effective January 1, 1977, no payment for any prescription ophthalmic device shall be made under Medi-Cal if that device does not meet the standards adopted by the department, the State Board of Optometry or the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California under Section 2541.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 279, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.55.

For the purposes of the pilot program established under Section 14495.10, or, if Section 14495.10 is repealed and replaced by Section 14132.20, then under the program implemented pursuant to Section 14132.20, the department shall develop a reimbursement rate for continuous skilled nursing care services provided by a participating health facility to developmentally disabled individuals who meet the federal waiver eligibility criteria or Medi-Cal State Plan amendment criteria. The reimbursement rate shall be determined in accordance with a methodology that
 shall be developed by the department. The department may elect to establish individual patient-specific rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 41.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14110.6.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations, establishing payment rates for nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled, and intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, which are sufficient to provide an increase of one dollar and ninety-six cents ($1.96) per patient day for patients receiving skilled nursing services, one dollar and fifty-eight cents ($1.58) per patient day, for patients receiving intermediate care services, two dollars and twenty-nine cents ($2.29) per patient day for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled patients, to be used for wage increases and benefits to
 all employees, except a licensed nursing home administrator or an administrator-in-training and two dollars and thirty-five cents ($2.35) per patient day for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative patients in facilities with 4 to 6 beds, and one dollar and ninety-eight cents ($1.98) per patient day for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative patients in facilities with 7 to 15 beds, to be used for wage increases and benefits to all direct care staff. However, if either (1) the entry level wages of the lowest paid nonadministrative employee of a nursing facility, intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled, or intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, exceeds six dollars ($6) per hour as of August 1, 1984; or (2) upon the election of a county board of supervisors, for any nursing facility, intermediate care
 facility/developmentally disabled, or intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative, which is operated by a county, the funds received pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be used solely for labor costs directly related to providing patient care services in order to meet patients’ needs including the uses of funds provided for under subdivision (d) of Section 14110.7. Any increase in wages and benefits required by this section shall be in addition to any future mandatory increases required by federal or state law. The rate shall provide funding for the portion of additional costs necessary to implement the wage and benefit increase required by this section attributable to Medi-Cal patients. The portion of those additional costs shall be the same as the ratio of Medi-Cal patients to the total number of patients in the facility. These regulations shall be adopted,
 effective March 15, 1985, for skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities, and intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled, and by October 1, 1985, for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative. Commencing October 1, 1990, these requirements shall become operative for nursing facilities.

(b) Each nursing facility or intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled, or, for the period prior to October 1, 1990, each skilled nursing facility or intermediate care facility, shall certify all of the following:

(1) All employees, except a licensed nursing home administrator or an administrator-in-training of a licensed nursing home, shall receive at least the prevailing federal or state minimum wage rate plus the
 average hourly wage increase established pursuant to Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1978, and this section.

(2) All employees of the facility, except a licensed administrator or administrator-in-training, shall be paid not less than the sum of the employee’s actual rate of pay as of the effective date of the Medi-Cal rate increase provided for under Section 14110.7 plus the amount of the adjustment specified pursuant to this section, or not less than the applicable agreed to rate plus the amount of the adjustment, whichever is greater.

(3) Any wage increase required pursuant to Section 1268.5 of the Health and Safety Code, is in addition to any minimum wages provided in this section.

(4) For purposes of determining
 the amount of Medi-Cal funds to be distributed for employee wages and benefits, the total Medi-Cal patient days recorded by the facility in the month of December 1983 shall be multiplied by the amount per patient day specified in subdivision (a) plus the amount provided by Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1978. The new wage levels shall be determined by dividing the Medi-Cal funds received by the nonovertime hours worked by covered employees in December 1983, plus any adjustments due to additional employees as specified in Section 14110.7 and adjustments to reflect employee benefit allowances.

(c) Each intermediate care facility/developmentally disabled-habilitative shall certify all of the following:

(1) All direct care staff, as defined in the department’s regulations developed
 pursuant to Section 1267.7 of the Health and Safety Code, shall receive at least the prevailing federal or state minimum wage plus the average hourly wage increase pursuant to this section.

(2) For purposes of determining the amount of Medi-Cal funds to be distributed for intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative for employee wages and benefits, the total Medi-Cal patient days in the month of December 1984, shall be multiplied by the amount per patient day specified in subdivision (a). The new wage level shall be determined by dividing the Medi-Cal funds received by the nonovertime hours by covered direct care employees in December 1984, and adjustments to reflect employee benefit allowances.

(d) The director shall order the inspection of relevant
 payroll and personnel records of facilities which are reimbursed for Medi-Cal patients under the rate of reimbursement established pursuant to subdivision (a) to ensure that the wage and benefit increases provided for have been implemented.

(e) The department shall, commencing August 1, 1999, increase the Medi-Cal reimbursement for level A and level B nursing facilities solely to provide funds for salaries, wages, and benefits increases for direct care staff. For the purposes of this subdivision, “direct care staff” means registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, and nurse assistants, who provide direct patient care. The amount of funds to be provided to each level A and level B facility pursuant to this subdivision shall be calculated on a per-patient-day basis, and shall be added to the per diem rate paid to each facility. The
 amount of funds provided under this subdivision to each nursing facility peer group shall be published in a Medi-Cal provider bulletin. Level A and level B facilities shall compensate their registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, and nurse assistants that portion of the rate increase provided under this subdivision in the form of salaries, wages, and benefits increases for their direct care staff. The total amount to be passed through by each facility shall be the per diem amount received by the facility pursuant to this subdivision times the facility’s number of Medi-Cal patient days.

(f) Subject to an appropriation for this purpose in the Budget Act of 2000, in addition to the increase specified in subdivision (e), the department shall, commencing August 1, 2000, increase the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for nursing facilities, intermediate care
 facilities/developmentally disabled, intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative, and intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-nursing solely to provide funds for salaries, wages, and benefits increases for direct care staff and other staff, subject to all of the following:

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, “direct care staff in nursing facilities” means the following:

(A) Registered nurses and licensed vocational nurses, when employed in the performance of direct care to patients.

(B) Employees in the nurse assistant classification employed in the performance of direct care to patients at a freestanding or distinct-part nursing facility, including job titles such as nursing aide,
 aide, practical nurse, orderly, nurse assistant, and certified nurse assistant.

(C) Employees performing respiratory therapy services for Medi-Cal pediatric subacute patients, including job titles such as respiratory care practitioner, respiratory technician, respiratory therapist inhalation technician, and inhalation therapist.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “direct care staff in intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled, intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-habilitative, and intermediate care facilities/developmentally disabled-nursing” means all of the following:

(A) A qualified intellectual disability professional employed in the performance of direct care to
 patients.

(B) Lead personnel employed in the performance of direct care to patients. Lead personnel described in this subparagraph shall not be considered to be supervisory.

(C) Employees in the nurse assistant classification employed in the performance of direct care to patients at a freestanding or distinct-part nursing facility, including job titles such as nurse assistants and aides.

(D) Other nonsupervisory staff providing direct patient care.

(E) Registered nurses and licensed vocational nurses, if employed in the performance of direct care to patients.

(3) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), “direct
 care staff” shall not include registered nurses or other personnel performing supervisory functions or housekeeping or maintenance staff in any facility.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “other staff” means all of the following personnel:

(A) Linen and laundry staff.

(B) Plant operations and maintenance staff.

(C) Housekeeping staff.

(D) Dietary staff.

(5) (A) The amount of funds to be provided to each facility pursuant to this subdivision shall be added to the per diem rate paid to each facility on a
 per-patient-day basis.

(B) The per diem amount of funds provided to each facility type and peer group pursuant to this subdivision shall be published in a Medi-Cal provider bulletin. Nursing facilities that are part of an acute care hospital and subacute facilities shall be notified of their per diem amount provided pursuant to this subdivision in a separate letter to each facility.

(6) (A) Facilities receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision shall compensate staff that portion of the rate increase provided pursuant to this subdivision in the form of salaries, wages, and benefits increases. The total amount to be passed through pursuant to this subdivision by each facility shall be the per diem amount received by the facility pursuant to this subdivision
 multiplied by the facility’s number of Medi-Cal patient days.

(B) Each direct care and other staff employee classification shall receive a portion of the rate increase provided pursuant to this subdivision in the form of an increase in salary, wage, and benefits. The facility may allocate the amounts that each classification may receive, but the amount shall not be nominal or zero.

(C) Funds passed through pursuant to this subdivision for purposes of salary, wages, or benefits increases may not be used for any salary, wage, or benefit increase that were committed to by a facility prior to August 1, 2000, nor may these funds be used for any salaries, wages, or benefits that the facility would have paid in the absence of this subdivision.

(D) Funds passed through pursuant to this subdivision for purposes of salary, wages, or benefits increases may not be distributed to direct care and other staff in the form of bonuses. These funds may, however, be used to provide retroactive pay
 increases if those wage increases also increase the employee’s base salary rate.

(7) The base from which direct care and other staff salaries, wages, and benefits shall be increased shall be the aggregate per hour salaries, wages, and benefits for the period of August 1, 1999, to July 31, 2000, inclusive.

(8) The department may inspect relevant payroll and personnel records of facilities receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision in order to ensure that the salary, wage, and benefit increases provided for pursuant to this subdivision have been implemented.

(9) Each facility receiving funds from the department, or from a county organized health system described in paragraph (10) pursuant to this
 subdivision shall certify on the form provided by the department that these funds were expended for increased direct care and other staff salary, wages, and benefits increases in accordance with this subdivision. The facility shall return the form to the department by October 1, 2001. The facility shall submit a copy of the completed form to all collective bargaining agents with whom the facility has collective bargaining agreements for direct care and other staff at the facility.
